Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-322.05
Sexual abuse of a detainee; penalty.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Detainee means an individual who has been:

(i) Arrested by a person;

(ii) Detained by a person, regardless of whether the detainee has been arrested or charged; or

(iii) Placed into the custody of a person, regardless of whether the detainee has been arrested or charged;

(b) Law enforcement agency means an agency or department of this state or of any political subdivision of this state which is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime; the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of this state or any political subdivision of this state; and the enforcement of arrest warrants. Law enforcement agency includes a police department, an office of the town marshal, an office of the county sheriff, the Nebraska State Patrol, and any department to which a deputy state sheriff is assigned as provided in section 84-106; and

(c) Person means an individual:

(i) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency, including an individual working under contract with the agency;

(ii) To whom the law enforcement agency has authorized or delegated authority to make arrests, to place a detainee in detention or custody, or to otherwise exercise control over a detainee or a detainee's activities; and

(iii) Who is not the spouse of a detainee.

(2) A person commits the offense of sexual abuse of a detainee if the person engages in sexual penetration or sexual contact with a detainee. It is not a defense to a charge under this section that the detainee consented to such sexual penetration or sexual contact.

(3) An otherwise lawful pat-down or body cavity search by a person is not a violation of this section.

(4) Any person who engages in sexual penetration with a detainee is guilty of sexual abuse of a detainee in the first degree. Sexual abuse of a detainee in the first degree is a Class IIA felony.

(5) Any person who engages in sexual contact with a detainee is guilty of sexual abuse of a detainee in the second degree. Sexual abuse of a detainee in the second degree is a Class IIIA felony.

Laws 2019, LB519, § 8.